lt-LT_morphology.aff
FLAG num
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Masc_Sg_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Masc_Sg_Voc
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Masc_Sg_Voc_rare
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Masc_Pl_Nom
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Masc_Pl_Gen
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Masc_Pl_Dat
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Masc_Pl_Dat_short
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Masc_Pl_Acc
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Masc_Pl_Inst
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Masc_Pl_Loc
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Masc_Pl_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Masc_Pl_Voc
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Fem_Sg_Nom
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Fem_Sg_Gen
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Fem_Sg_Dat
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Fem_Sg_Acc
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Fem_Sg_Inst
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Fem_Sg_Loc
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Fem_Sg_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Fem_Sg_Voc
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Fem_Pl_Nom
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Fem_Pl_Gen
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Fem_Pl_Dat
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Fem_Pl_Dat_short
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Fem_Pl_Acc
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Fem_Pl_Inst
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Fem_Pl_Inst_short
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Fem_Pl_Loc
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Fem_Pl_Voc
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Masc_Sg_Nom
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Masc_Sg_Nom_rare
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Masc_Sg_Gen
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Masc_Sg_Dat
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Masc_Sg_Acc
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Masc_Sg_Inst
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Masc_Sg_Loc
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Masc_Sg_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Masc_Sg_Voc
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Masc_Sg_Voc_rare
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Masc_Pl_Nom
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Masc_Pl_Gen
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Masc_Pl_Dat
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Masc_Pl_Dat_short
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Masc_Pl_Acc
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Masc_Pl_Inst
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Masc_Pl_Loc
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Masc_Pl_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Masc_Pl_Voc
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Sg_Nom
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Sg_Gen
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Sg_Dat
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Sg_Acc
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Sg_Inst
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Sg_Loc
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Sg_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Sg_Voc
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Pl_Nom
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Pl_Gen
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Pl_Dat
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Pl_Dat_short
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Pl_Acc
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Pl_Inst
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Pl_Inst_short
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Pl_Loc
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Pl_Voc
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Masc_Sg_Il
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Masc_Pl_Il
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Fem_Sg_Il
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Fem_Pl_Il
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Masc_Sg_Il
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Masc_Pl_Il
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Sg_Il
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Pl_Il
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Masc_Dual
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Fem_Dual
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Masc_Dual
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Dual
AM is:Optative
AM is:Indic_Past_Sg_I
AM is:Indic_Past_Sg_II
AM is:Indic_Past_Pl_I
AM is:Indic_Past_Pl_I_short
AM is:Indic_Past_Pl_II
AM is:Indic_Past_Pl_II_short
AM is:Indic_Past_III
AM is:Indic_Past_Sg_I_short
AM is:Indic_Past_Sg_II_short
AM is:Indic_Past_III_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Nom_rare
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Voc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Voc_rare
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Neut
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Nom_rare
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Dat_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Voc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Voc_rare
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Voc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Dat_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Inst_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Voc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Nom_rare
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Voc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Voc_rare
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Dat_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Voc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Voc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Dat_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Inst_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Voc
AM is:Gerund_Past
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Dual
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Dual
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Dual
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Dual
AM is:none
AM is:Super_short_rare
AM is:rare
AM is:Super_short

SFX 1 Y 4
SFX 1 as as . 75
SFX 1 as o . 76
SFX 1 ai ai . 77
SFX 1 ai ų . 78

SFX 3 Y 10
SFX 3 as ui . 79
SFX 3 as ą . 80
SFX 3 as u . 81
SFX 3 as e . 82
SFX 3 ai ams . 83
SFX 3 ai am . 84
SFX 3 ai us . 85
SFX 3 ai ais . 86
SFX 3 ai uose . 87
SFX 3 ai uos . 88

SFX 7 Y 1
SFX 7 as e . 89

SFX 8 Y 1
SFX 8 ukas uk . 89

SFX 9 Y 1
SFX 9 as ai . 89

SFX 10 Y 2
SFX 10 as an . 90
SFX 10 ai uosna . 91

SFX 11 Y 1
SFX 11 as u . 92

SFX 12 Y 2
SFX 12 as ai . 77
SFX 12 as ų . 78

SFX 14 Y 6
SFX 14 as ams . 83
SFX 14 as am . 84
SFX 14 as us . 85
SFX 14 as ais . 86
SFX 14 as uose . 87
SFX 14 as uos . 88

SFX 20 Y 1
SFX 20 as ai . 93

SFX 21 Y 1
SFX 21 as uosna . 91

SFX 30 Y 1
SFX 30 ai ai . 93

SFX 32 Y 4
SFX 32 as as . 94
SFX 32 as o . 95
SFX 32 ai ai . 96
SFX 32 ai ų . 97

SFX 34 Y 10
SFX 34 as ui . 98
SFX 34 as ą . 99
SFX 34 as u . 100
SFX 34 as e . 101
SFX 34 ai ams . 102
SFX 34 ai am . 103
SFX 34 ai us . 104
SFX 34 ai ais . 105
SFX 34 ai uose . 106
SFX 34 ai uos . 107

SFX 38 Y 2
SFX 38 as e . 108
SFX 38 ai ai . 109

SFX 39 Y 2
SFX 39 as an . 110
SFX 39 ai uosna . 111

SFX 40 Y 1
SFX 40 as u . 112

SFX 41 Y 2
SFX 41 as ai . 96
SFX 41 as ų . 97

SFX 43 Y 6
SFX 43 as ams . 102
SFX 43 as am . 103
SFX 43 as us . 104
SFX 43 as ais . 105
SFX 43 as uose . 106
SFX 43 as uos . 107

SFX 49 Y 1
SFX 49 as ai . 109

AF 1,3,9,30,65521 # 1
AF 1,3,7,10,12,14,20,21,30,65521 # 7
AF 1,3,9,12,14,20,30,65521 # 8
AF 1,3,10,12,14,21,65521 # 10
AF 1,3,7,10,30,65521 # 24
AF 1,3,7,30,65521 # 30
AF 1,3,8,10,12,14,20,21,30,65521 # 33
AF 1,3,8,9,30,65521 # 58
AF 1,3,8,9,12,14,20,30,65521 # 67
AF 32,34,38,39,41,43,49,50,65521 # 353
