lt-LT_morphology.dic
apsirgimas/7	5
apvytimas/7	5
atitrūkimas/7	5
atitvėrimas/7	5
atmintukas/33	5
auksinukas/33	5
avantiūrizmas/24	5
Babikas/8	6
Baidokas/8	6
baigimas/7	5
balnas/7	5
birbynininkas/7	5
bizniukas/33	5
Bluzmanas/8	6
bromokriptinas/10	5
bronchitas/7	5
Bulanovas/8	6
Daučiūnas/8	6
daugiaetapiškumas/7	5
deimantukas/33	5
Deržanauskas/8	6
didingumas/7	5
disponentas/7	5
distiliavimas/24	5
draskymas/7	5
Dubenčiukas/67	6
dulkėtumas/24	5
egzegetas/7	5
fazaniukas/33	5
ferometras/7	5
Gabijūnas/8	6
Gabriūnas/8	6
gaivališkumas/24	5
galabijimas/7	5
ginekologas/7	5
Giršas/8	6
Gudinas/8	6
heliotropas/7	5
įlašinimas/7	5
ilgesingumas/24	5
imperininkas/7	5
išblaškymas/7	5
išbrinkimas/7	5
išbučiavimas/7	5
išriedėjimas/7	5
įvardinimas/7	5
jugendas/24	5
junglumas/24	5
juvenologas/7	5
Kamsiukas/67	6
Karpickas/8	6
Kaukas/67	6
kenkimas/7	5
kevalas/7	5
kiaukutas/7	5
kontržvalgybininkas/7	5
krizas/353	5
landlordas/7	5
Latukas/67	6
Leitonas/8	6
lėtinimas/7	5
letrozolas/10	5
Levanas/8	6
litografavimas/24	5
Liubavas/30	7
Mataras/8	6
Medardukas/58	4
megakariocitas/7	5
Mudinas/8	6
Naverdauskas/8	6
nazofaringitas/10	5
nedraugas/353	5
nekrikštas/353	5
nelicencijavimas/7	5
nendrinukas/33	5
nesurengimas/24	5
nikardipinas/10	5
Nikontas/8	6
nubraižymas/7	5
nusidėjimas/7	16
Ovenas/1	6
paaugliukas/33	5
Pamerneckas/8	6
pamiklinimas/7	5
partvarkymas/24	5
pašlemėkas/353	5
penkioliktukas/33	5
peptonas/7	5
perstatinėjimas/7	5
pleptelėjimas/7	5
plėšrumas/24	5
polimiksinas/7	5
polipropenas/10	5
praskyrimas/7	5
proteinas/7	5
Pūras/8	6
Rachmančiukas/67	6
rakursas/7	5
religininkas/7	5
rezidavimas/7	5
Saikauskas/8	6
sąjungininkas/7	5
skarifikavimas/7	5
Skuratovas/8	6
skverbimas/7	5
smeigtukas/33	5
spiningas/7	5
Stadalnykas/8	6
sugijimas/7	5
suliesėjimas/7	5
susijaudinimas/7	16
šaudymas/7	5
težimas/7	5
tiektuvas/7	5
tigriukas/33	5
Tomašas/1	4
topinambas/7	5
Tuominas/8	6
užtušavimas/7	5
užvadas/353	5
Varapnickas/8	6
Varkauskas/8	6
varmas/7	5
vyturiukas/33	5
žabtas/353	5
Žiliukas/67	6
žlaugtas/7	5
pereryvas/7	71
podsračnykas/7	71
